de: Größenbezeichnungssystem für Nähgarn: Englische Baumwollnummer (Ne); Denier; Government-Größe; Tex; Ticket (Nm); V-Größe; Gewichtsnummer (wt); Sonstige
sl-SI: Sistem debeline sukanca za šivanje: Bombažna številka (Ne); Denier; Velikost (Government); Tex; Ticket (Nm); Velikost V; Številka teže (wt); Drugo
ru: Система размеров швейной нити: Номер хлопчатобумажной пряжи (Ne); Денье; Государственный стандарт размера; Текс; Этикеточный номер (Nm); Размер V; Номер по весу (wt); Другое
hr-HR: Sustav veličine niti za šivanje: Broj pamuka (Ne); Denier; Veličina Government; Tex; Oznaka Ticket (Nm); Veličina V; Broj težine (wt); Ostalo
sk-SK: Systém označovania veľkosti šijacej nite: Číslovanie bavlny (Ne); Denier; Veľkosť Government; Tex; Číslovanie metrické (Nm / Ticket); Veľkosť V; Hmotnostné číslo (wt); Iné
ja: 縫製糸サイズ規格: 綿番手 (Ne); デニール; ガバメントサイズ; テックス; チケット番号 (Nm); Vサイズ; 番手 (wt); その他
hu: Varrócérna számozási rendszere: Pamutfonalszám (Ne); Denier; Kormányzati méret; Tex; Címkeszám (Nm); V méret; Súlymérőszám (wt); Egyéb
ro-RO: Sistem de numerotare a mărimii aței de cusut: Titlul bumbacului (Ne); Denier; Mărime guvernamentală; Tex; Număr metric (Nm); Mărime V; Număr de greutate (wt); Altele
zh-TW: 縫紉線尺寸系統: 棉紗支數 (Ne); 丹尼; 政府標準尺寸; Tex; 號數 (Nm); V 尺寸; 重量支數 (wt); 其他
fr: Système de numérotation du fil à coudre: Titre du coton (Ne); Denier; Taille gouvernementale; Tex; Titre (Nm); Taille V; Poids (wt); Autre
fi: Ompelulangan kokoluokitus: Puuvillanumero (Ne); Denier; Viranomaiskoko; Tex; Tunnusluku (Nm); V-koko; Painonumero (wt); Muu
cs: Systém velikostí šicí nitě: Bavlnářské číslování (Ne); Denier; Vládní velikost; Tex; Etiketní číslo (Nm); Velikost V; Hmotnostní číslo (wt); Jiné
vi: Hệ thống kích thước chỉ may: Chỉ số bông (Ne); Denier; Kích cỡ tiêu chuẩn chính phủ; Tex; Độ mảnh (Nm); Cỡ V; Chỉ số trọng lượng (wt); Khác
pt-BR: Linha de costura sistema de tamanho: Contagem de algodão (Ne); Denier; Tamanho governamental; Tex; Etiqueta (Nm); Tamanho V; Peso (wt); Outro
el: Σύστημα μεγέθους κλωστών ραπτικής: Μέτρηση βαμβακιού (Ne); Ντενιέ; Κυβερνητικό μέγεθος; Tex; Ticket (Nm); Μέγεθος V; Αριθμός βάρους (wt); Άλλο
nb: Størrelsessystem for sytråd: Bomullsnummer (Ne); Denier; Government-størrelse; Tex; Garnnummer (Nm); V-størrelse; Vektnummer (wt); Annet
it: Sistema di titolazione del filo da cucito: Titolo cotone (Ne); Denari; Misura governativa; Tex; Etichetta (Nm); Misura V; Peso (wt); Altro
pt-PT: Sistema de classificação do tamanho da linha de costura: Contagem de algodão (Ne); Denier; Tamanho governamental; Tex; Etiqueta (Nm); Tamanho V; Número de peso (wt); Outro
da: Størrelsessystem for sytråd: Bomuldsnummerering (Ne); Denier; Government-størrelse; Tex; Ticket-nummer (Nm); V-størrelse; Vægtnummer (wt); Andet
tr: Dikiş ipliği numaralandırma sistemi: Pamuk numarası (Ne); Denye; Devlet numarası; Tex; Etiket (Nm); V numarası; Ağırlık numarası (wt); Diğer
lt-LT: Siuvimo siūlų dydžio sistema: Medvilnės numeris (Ne); Denai; Vyriausybės dydžio sistema; Teksas (Tex); Metrinis numeris (Nm); V dydis; Svorio numeris (wt); Kita
th: จักรเย็บผ้าและระบบขนาด: ขนาดด้ายฝ้าย (Ne); ดีเนียร์; ขนาดมาตรฐานรัฐบาล; Tex; Ticket (Nm); ขนาด V; หมายเลขน้ำหนัก (wt); อื่นๆ
nl: Naaigaren maatsysteem: Katoennummer (Ne); Denier; Government-maat; Tex; Ticket (Nm); V-maat; Gewichtsnummer (wt); Overig
sv: Sytråd – storlekssystem: Bomullsnummer (Ne); Denier; Government-storlek; Tex; Metriskt nummer (Nm); V-storlek; Viktnummer (wt); Övrigt
pl: System rozmiarów nici do szycia: Numeracja bawełniana (Ne); Denier; Rozmiar rządowy; Tex; Numer metryczny (Nm); Rozmiar V; Grubość (wt); Inne
es: Sistema de tamaño hilo de coser: Título del algodón (Ne); Denier; Tamaño gubernamental; Tex; Número métrico (Nm); Talla V; Número de peso (wt); Otro
ko: 재봉실 사이즈 체계: 면사 번수(Ne); 데니어; 정부 표준 사이즈; 텍스; 티켓 번수(Nm); V 사이즈; 무게 번수(wt); 기타
zh-CN: 缝纫线规格系统: 棉纱支数（Ne）; 旦尼尔; 政府标准; 特克斯（Tex）; 标签支数（Nm）; V 号; 重量标号（wt）; 其他
en: Sewing thread size system: Cotton count (Ne); Denier; Government size; Tex; Ticket (Nm); V size; Weight number (wt); Other
bg-BG: Система за означаване на размера на шевния конец: Памучен брой (Ne); Дение; Правителствен размер; Текс; Етикет (Nm); V размер; Номер на теглото (wt); Друго